Hawaii, session 2026, HB56.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature recognizes that certain irresponsible parties have been intentionally leaving nails, screws, and other items on roads on the island of Oahu, particularly in Kaimuki and Makakilo.  These injurious materials have caused severe damage to the tires of motor vehicles.  The legislature finds it necessary to ensure the safety of drivers and pedestrians by deterring this behavior. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to prohibit placing, dropping, or leaving injurious materials on highways, lanes, roads, streets, and alleys. SECTION 2.  Chapter 291C, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part XII to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§291C-     Injurious materials; prohibitions.  (a) No person shall intentionally or knowingly place or drop upon any part of a highway, lane, road, street, or alley any tack, bottle, wire, glass, nail, screw, or other article that may damage or injure any person, vehicle, or animal traveling along or upon the highway, lane, road, street, or alley, unless the person is authorized to do so by an appropriate governmental agency. (b)  Any person who drops or permits to be dropped or thrown upon any highway, lane, road, street, or alley any destructive or injurious material shall immediately remove the material from the highway, lane, road, street, or alley. (c)  Any person authorized to remove a wrecked or damaged vehicle from a highway, lane, road, street, or alley shall remove any glass or other injurious substance dropped upon the highway, lane, road, street, or alley from the vehicle. (d)  No person shall place any obstruction in or upon a highway, lane, road, street, or alley unless authorized to do so by an appropriate governmental agency. (e)  A person convicted of violating of this section shall be guilty of a violation; provided that if: (1)  The offense was committed within one year of a prior conviction for a motor vehicle or traffic offense, the person shall be guilty of a petty misdemeanor, unless paragraph (3) applies; (2)  The offense was committed within one year of two or more prior convictions for motor vehicle or traffic offenses, the person shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, unless paragraph (3) applies; and (3)  The person violated subsection (a) and did so with intent to cause physical harm or damage to any person or vehicle, the person shall be guilty of a class C felony." SECTION 3.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 4.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________